Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 13
PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM

Sec.

§ 59-1301. Public employee retirement system created — Purpose — Duties of fiduciaries of retirement fund.

A retirement and disability benefit system is created and placed under the management of a retirement board for the purpose of providing a retirement system and other benefits for public employees in the state of Idaho under this chapter. The retirement system shall be known as the “Public Employee Retirement System of Idaho.”

The purpose of such system is to provide an orderly means whereby public employees in the state of Idaho who become superannuated or otherwise incapacitated as the result of age or disability, may be retired from active service without prejudice and without inflicting a hardship upon the employees retired, and to enable such employees to accumulate pension credits to provide for old-age, disability, death and termination of employment, thus effecting economy and efficiency in the administration of the state, county and local government. The legislature, therefore, declares that, in its considered judgment, the public good, and the general welfare of the citizens of this state required the enactment of this measure, under the police powers of the state.

for the exclusive purpose of:

providing benefits to members and their beneficiaries; and

defraying reasonable expenses of administering the system;

with the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims;

by diversifying the investments of the fund so as to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so; and

in accordance with the provisions of the Idaho Code governing the system.

With respect to the retirement fund created in this chapter, the fiduciaries of the fund shall discharge their duties with respect to the fund solely in the interest of the members and their beneficiaries

§ 59-1302. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, each of the terms defined in this section shall have the meaning given in this section unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context.

“Active member” means any employee who is not establishing the right to receive benefits through his or her employer’s participation in any other retirement system established for Idaho public employees, if such participation is mandated by applicable Idaho statutes other than this chapter. In no case will an employee be entitled to any benefit under this chapter for public service if such employee is establishing retirement benefit entitlements by other Idaho statutes or federal statutes other than military service or social security for that same service.

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of amounts contributed by a member of the system, together with regular interest credit thereon.

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit equal in value to another benefit, when computed upon the basis of the actuarial tables in use by the system.

“Actuarial tables” means such tables as shall have been adopted by the board in accordance with recommendations of the actuary.

The highest average salary; and

Membership service of at least one-half (1/2) the number of months in the period, excluding months of service attributable to:

“Beneficiary” means the person who is nominated by the written designation of a member, duly executed and filed with the board, to receive the death benefit.

“Calendar year” means twelve (12) calendar months commencing on the first day of January.

“Credited service” means the aggregate of membership service, prior service and disabled service.

“Date of establishment” means July 1, 1965, or a later date established by the board or statute.

“Death benefit” means the amount, if any, payable upon the death of a member.

“Disability retirement allowance” means the periodic payment becoming payable to a member who meets all applicable eligibility requirements for disability retirement.

“Disabled” means:

That the member is prevented from engaging in any occupation or employment for remuneration or profit as a result of bodily injury or disease, either occupational or nonoccupational in cause, but excluding disabilities resulting from service in the armed forces of any country other than the United States, or from an intentionally self-inflicted injury; and

That the member will likely remain so disabled permanently and continuously during the remainder of the member’s life.

“Early retirement allowance” means the periodic payment becoming payable to a member who meets all applicable eligibility requirements for early retirement.

“Employee” means:
(14)(A) “Employee” means:

“Employee” does not include employment as:

Any person who normally works twenty (20) hours or more per week for an employer, or a schoolteacher who works half-time or more for an employer and who receives salary for services rendered for such employer;

Elected officials or appointed officials of an employer who receive a salary;

A person who is separated from service with fewer than five (5) consecutive months of employment and who is reemployed or reinstated by the same employer within thirty (30) days; or

A person receiving differential wage payments as defined in 26 U.S.C. 3401(h) on or after July 1, 2009. A differential wage payment generally refers to an employer payment to an employee called to active duty in the uniformed services for more than thirty (30) days that represents all or a portion of the compensation he would have received from the employer if he were performing services for the employer.

A student enrolled in an undergraduate, graduate, or professional-technical program at and employed by a state college, university, community college or professional-technical center when such employment is predicated on student status; or

A person making contributions to the director of the office of personnel management under the United States civil service system retirement act except that a person who receives separate remuneration for work currently performed for an employer and the United States government may elect to be a member of the retirement system in accordance with rules of the board; or

A person not under contract with a school district or charter school, who on a day-to-day basis works as a substitute teacher replacing a contracted teacher and is paid a substitute wage as established by district policy or who on a day-to-day basis works as a substitute assistant replacing a staff instruction assistant or a staff library assistant and is paid a substitute wage as established by district policy; or

A person occupying a position that does not exceed eight (8) consecutive months in a calendar year with a city, county, irrigation district, cemetery district or mosquito abatement district when the city, county, irrigation district, cemetery district or mosquito abatement district has certified, in writing to the system, the position is: (i) seasonal or casual; and (ii) affected by weather, including parks, golf course positions and irrigation positions; or
(i) A person in a position that: (i) is eligible for participation in an optional retirement program established under section 33-107A or 33-107B, Idaho Code, or (ii) would be eligible for participation in an optional retirement program established under section 33-107A or 33-107B, Idaho Code, if the person was not working less than half-time or fewer than twenty (20) hours per week.

“Employer” means the state of Idaho, or any political subdivision or governmental entity, provided such subdivision or entity has elected to come into the system. Governmental entity means any organization composed of units of government of Idaho or organizations funded only by government or employee contributions or organizations that discharge governmental responsibilities or proprietary responsibilities that would otherwise be performed by government. All governmental entities are deemed to be political subdivisions for the purpose of this chapter. Provided however, that on and after the effective date of this act, all new employers added to the public employee retirement system must be in compliance with internal revenue regulations governing governmental retirement plans.

“Firefighter” means an employee, including paid firefighters hired on or after October 1, 1980, whose primary occupation is that of preventing and extinguishing fires as determined by the rules of the board.

“Fiscal year” means the period beginning on July 1 in any year and ending on June 30 of the next succeeding year.

“Fund” means the public employee retirement fund established by this chapter.

“Funding agent” means any bank or banks, trust company or trust companies, legal reserve life insurance company or legal reserve life insurance companies, or combinations thereof, any thrift institution or credit union or any investment management firm or individual investment manager selected by the board to hold and/or invest the employers’ and members’ contributions and pay certain benefits granted under this chapter.

“Inactive member” means a former active member who is not an employee and is not receiving any form of retirement allowance, who has not requested a separation benefit, or for whom a separation benefit has not become payable.

Not eligible to participate and not required to contribute as an employee when:

Not eligible for retirement where there has been no termination of employment from an employer participating in PERSI, the judges retirement fund, the firefighters retirement fund or the optional retirement plan or a withdrawn employer; or

Not eligible to receive a separation benefit where there has been no termination of employment from an employer participating in PERSI, the judges retirement fund, the firefighters retirement fund or the optional retirement plan or a withdrawn employer.

“Member” means an active member, inactive member or a retired member.

“Membership service” means military service that occurs after the commencement of contributions payable under sections 59-1331 through 59-1334, Idaho Code, and service with respect to which contributions are payable under sections 59-1331 through 59-1334, Idaho Code, which, except for benefit calculations described in sections 59-1342 and 59-1353, Idaho Code, includes service transferred to a segregated account under an approved domestic retirement order.

“Military service” means any period of active duty service in the armed forces of the United States including the national guard and reserves, under the provisions of title 10, title 32, and title 37, United States code, that commences fewer than ninety (90) days after the person ceases to be an employee and ends fewer than ninety (90) days before the person again becomes an employee. Provided, if a member fails to again become an employee as a result of his death while in active duty service, the member shall be entitled to military service through the date of death. Provided further, if a member fails to again become an employee due to a disability retirement resulting from service in the armed forces of the United States, the member shall be entitled to military service through the date the disability allowance becomes payable. In no event shall military service include:

Any period ended by dishonorable discharge or during which termination of such service is available but not accepted; or

Any active duty service in excess of five (5) years if at the convenience of the United States government, or in excess of four (4) years if not at the convenience of the United States government, provided additional membership service may be purchased as provided in section 59-1362, Idaho Code.

“Police officer” for retirement purposes shall be as defined in section 59-1303, Idaho Code.
(24)(a) “Police officer” for retirement purposes shall be as defined in section 59-1303, Idaho Code.

“POST” means the Idaho peace officer standards and training council established in chapter 51, title 19, Idaho Code.

“Prior service” means any period prior to July 1, 1965, of military service or of employment for the state of Idaho or any political subdivision or other employer of each employee who is an active member or in military service or on leave of absence on the date of establishment, provided, however, an employee who was not an active member or in military service or on leave of absence on the date of establishment shall receive credit for the member’s service prior to July 1, 1965, on the basis of recognizing two (2) months of such service for each month of membership service. For the purpose of computing such service, no deduction shall be made for any continuous period of absence from service or military service of six (6) months or less.

“Regular interest” means interest at the rate set from time to time by the board.

“Retired member” means a former active member receiving a retirement allowance.

“Retirement” means the acceptance of a retirement allowance under this chapter upon termination of employment and, unless otherwise provided by law, requires a termination of employment from an employer participating in PERSI, the judges retirement fund, the firefighters retirement fund or the optional retirement plan.
(29) “Retirement board” or “board” means the board provided for in sections 59-1304 and 59-1305, Idaho Code, to administer the retirement system.

The total salary or wages paid to a person who meets the definition of employee by an employer for personal services performed and reported by the employer for income tax purposes, including the cash value of all remuneration in any medium other than cash.

The total amount of any voluntary reduction in salary agreed to by the member and employer where the reduction is used as an alternative form of remuneration to the member.

Differential wage payments as defined in 26 U.S.C. 3401(h). A differential wage payment generally refers to an employer payment to an employee called to active duty in the uniformed services for more than thirty (30) days that represents all or a portion of the compensation he would have received from the employer if he were performing services for the employer.

Employer payments to employees for or related to travel, mileage, meals, lodging or subsistence expenses, without regard to the taxability of such payments for federal income tax purposes and without regard to the form of payment, including payment made as reimbursement of an itemized expense voucher and payment made of an unvouchered expense allowance.

§ 59-1302A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1303. Police officer member status.

As used in this chapter, each of the terms used in this section shall have the meaning given in this section unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context.

Police officer membership status for retirement purposes may be fixed only by law.

Members holding or filling the following positions or offices are designated by law as having police officer member status for retirement purposes during the time of their appointment to that position or during their term of office:

Idaho state police:

The director and deputy director of the Idaho state police;

Commissioned and sworn troopers, specialists (detectives), and POST training coordinators;

Commissioned and sworn personnel in a supervisory capacity as major, captain, lieutenant, or sergeant; and

The commissioned state brand inspector, deputy brand inspectors, and brand inspector supervisors;

County law enforcement:

County sheriffs;

“Peace officers” and “county detention officers” as defined in chapter 51, title 19, Idaho Code; and

Supervisory “peace officers” and “county detention officers” as defined in chapter 51, title 19, Idaho Code;

City law enforcement:

City police chiefs;

“Peace officers” as defined in chapter 51, title 19, Idaho Code; and

Supervisory “peace officers” as defined in chapter 51, title 19, Idaho Code;

Conservation officers, the enforcement assistant chief, and enforcement bureau chief of the department of fish and game;

Department of correction:

The director and deputy director of the department of correction, the division chief and deputy division chief for probation and parole, and the wardens and deputy wardens of institutions;

Correctional officers, presentence investigators, correctional officers in the supervisory capacity of lieutenant, sergeant, corporal, correctional specialist, correctional specialist supervisor, and correctional managers;

Probation and parole supervisors, probation and parole investigators, and probation and parole officers; and

Correctional peace officer training instructors;

Employees of the adjutant general and military division of the state where military membership is a condition of employment;

Magistrates of the district court; justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, and district judges who have made an election under section 1-2011, Idaho Code; and court employees designated by court order to have primary responsibility for court security or transportation of prisoners;

Employees whose primary function requires that they are certified by the Idaho department of health and welfare as an emergency medical technician-basic, an advanced emergency medical technician-ambulance, an emergency medical technician-intermediate, or an emergency medical technician-paramedic;

Criminal investigators of the attorney general’s office, and criminal investigators of a prosecuting attorney’s office; and

The director of security and the criminal investigators of the Idaho state lottery.

On and after July 1, 1985, no active member shall be classified as a police officer for retirement purposes unless the employer shall have certified to the board, on a form provided by the board, that such member is an employee whose primary position with the employer is one designated as such within the meaning of this chapter, and the board shall have accepted such certification. Acceptance by the board of an employer’s certification shall in no way limit the board’s right to review and reclassify the position for retirement purposes based upon an audit or other relevant information presented to the board. The board may carry out such acts as are necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

A member classified as a police officer for retirement purposes whose position is reclassified to that of a general member for retirement purposes as a result of a determination that the position does not meet the requirements of this chapter for police officer member status for retirement purposes shall become a general member. Excess employer and employee contributions shall be refunded to the employer by offsetting future contributions and the member’s record shall be corrected. It shall be the employer’s responsibility to refund employee contributions directly to the employee.

§ 59-1303A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1304. Retirement board — Appointment.

There is hereby created in the office of the governor a governing authority of the system to consist of a board of five (5) persons known as the retirement board. Each member of the board shall be appointed by the governor to serve a term of five (5) years. The governor shall designate one (1) member of the board to serve as chairman.

Two (2) board members shall be appointed from among active members having at least ten (10) years of credited service.

Three (3) board members shall be appointed from among Idaho citizens who are not members of the system except by reason of having served on the board.

Members of the board shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(h), Idaho Code. These allowances shall be paid from the administration account of the fund.

A board member shall serve until his successor qualifies. Each board member shall be entitled to one (1) vote, and three (3) board members shall constitute a quorum. Three (3) votes shall be necessary for resolution or action by the board at any meeting except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

The board shall hold regular meetings and shall hold special meetings at such times and at such places as it deems necessary. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public. The board shall keep a record of all its proceedings.

§ 59-1305. Powers and duties of board — Indemnification.

The board shall have the power and duty, subject to the limitations of this chapter, of managing the system. It shall have the powers and privileges of a corporation, including the right to sue and be sued in its own name as such board. Members of the retirement board, retirement system staff and retirement system mortgage and investment committee members shall, jointly and individually, be provided a defense and indemnified against all claims, demands, judgments, costs, charges and expenses, including court costs and attorney’s fees, and against all liability losses and damages of any nature whatsoever that arise out of and in the course and scope of their official duties and functions, but only if the defense and indemnity for such person’s wrongful act or omission are not provided by chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code, and the wrongful act or omission of the person was not intentional, willful or wanton misconduct, fraudulent, or a knowing violation of law. The board may, as a fiduciary of the trust, determine to provide a defense and indemnity hereunder. The board may, as a fiduciary of the trust, determine to refuse a defense, or disavow and refuse to pay any judgment against a board member, retirement system staff, or retirement system mortgage and investment committee member if it is determined that such person was not within the course and scope of his official duties and functions or his conduct was intentional misconduct, willful, wanton, fraudulent, or a knowing violation of the law. Any defense and indemnity provided under this section shall be an expense of the trust, and the board is authorized but not required to purchase insurance to protect against such risks notwithstanding any other provision of law. No contribution or indemnification, or reimbursement for legal fees and expenses related to such defense or indemnification, shall be sought from any person defended or indemnified under this section unless the court in which the underlying claim was brought finds that the act or omission of the person was outside the course and scope of his official duties and functions or was intentional, willful or wanton misconduct, fraudulent, or a knowing violation of law. Any action by the trust against a board member, retirement system staff, or mortgage and investment committee member, and any action by a person against the trust for contribution, indemnification or necessary legal fees and expenses shall be tried to the court in the same civil lawsuit brought on the claim against the retirement board member, retirement system staff, or retirement system mortgage and investment committee member. The venue of all actions in which the board is a party shall be Ada county, Idaho.

The board shall appoint an executive director to serve at its discretion. The executive director shall be the secretary to the board, bonded as is required by the board and shall perform such duties as assigned by the board. The executive director shall be authorized to designate a staff member as acting director or secretary in the director’s absence.

The board shall authorize the creation of whatever staff it deems necessary for sound and economical administration of the system. The executive director shall hire the persons for the staff who shall hold their respective positions subject to the rules of a merit system for state employees. The salaries and compensation of all persons employed for purposes of administering the system shall be fixed by the board and as otherwise provided by law.

The board shall obtain all actuarial, audit, legal and medical services it deems appropriate for the system. It shall cause a competent actuary who is a member of the academy of actuaries and who is familiar with public systems of pensions to be retained on a consulting basis. The actuary shall be the technical advisor of the board on matters regarding the operation of the system. During the first year of operation of the system and at least once every four (4) years thereafter, the actuary shall make a general investigation of the suitability of the actuarial tables used by the system. The board shall adopt the actuarial tables and assumptions in use by the system and may change the same in its sole discretion at any time. The actuary shall make an annual valuation of the liabilities and reserves of the system, and an annual determination of the amount of contributions required from the employers under this chapter, and certify the results thereof to the board. The actuary shall also perform such other duties as may be assigned by the board. An independent financial audit shall be conducted annually or as frequently as otherwise determined by the board.

The board shall establish the system’s office or offices to be used for the meetings of the board and for the general purposes of the administrative personnel. The board shall provide for the installation of a complete and adequate system of accounts and records for administering this chapter. All books and records shall be kept in the system’s offices.

If the board determines that it has previously overpaid or underpaid benefits provided under this chapter or chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, it shall correct the prior error. In the event of prior underpayment, the board shall forthwith pay the amount of the underpayment together with regular interest thereon. In the event of prior overpayment, the board may offset future benefit payments by the amount of the prior overpayment together with regular interest thereon. Any such decision to offset future benefit payments shall be administratively and judicially reviewable as provided in section 59-1314, Idaho Code. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to limit the rights of a member or the board to pursue any other remedy provided by law.

§ 59-1305A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1306. Conformity with federal tax code to maintain qualified plan tax status.

Chapter 13, title 59, and chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, shall be administered in a manner so as to comply with the requirements of 26 U.S.C. section 401(a)(8), (9), (16), (25), (31), (36) and (37) and with the vesting requirements described in 26 U.S.C. section 411(e)(2). The public employee retirement system board shall promulgate rules and amend or repeal conflicting rules in order to assure compliance with the requirements of these sections. This chapter shall be in full force and effect only so long as compliance with paragraphs (8), (9), (16), (25), (31), (36) and (37) of subsection 401(a) and paragraph (2) of subsection 411(e) of the Internal Revenue Code is required for public retirement systems. If compliance with any such paragraph is, at any point no longer required, this provision or the applicable portion thereof, will cease to have any force or effect.

§ 59-1307. Agreements with other retirement systems.

The board may enter into agreements with the boards or other authorities of other retirement systems operated by the state of Idaho or by political subdivisions to protect the retirement rights or benefits of employees who may alter their membership status by changing employment from one agency to another.

§ 59-1308. Supplemental benefit plan — Contributions and expenses of the supplemental benefit plan — Indemnification.

The state shall sponsor and the board shall administer one (1) or more supplemental benefit plans to be used for allocation of extraordinary gains as provided in section 59-1309, Idaho Code, and for voluntary contributions of active members. The supplemental plans may be established under the qualified requirements of section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Service Code and with the qualified cash or deferred arrangements under section 401(k) of the Internal Revenue Service Code or any other tax-deferred plan permitted by law, as determined by the retirement board. The board is authorized to secure such qualified staff and consultants as it determines necessary to establish and administer such plans. Employee and employer contributions shall be permitted according to the provisions of these plans as established by the board. For purposes of this section “employee” shall mean a participant as defined in the supplemental benefit plan documents or board rules.

The board is authorized, but not required, to establish separate trust funds to hold the assets of the supplemental benefit plans created under this section. The investment options available under supplemental benefit plans shall be determined by the board, and may include, but are not limited to, investment in all or part of the public employee retirement fund and use of private vendor options.

Supplemental benefit plans shall be available to all active members and shall be in addition to any other retirement or tax-deferred compensation system established by the employer. The board may provide educational opportunities related to supplemental benefit plans and retirement savings, as determined by the board.

Accounts shall be established in supplemental benefit plans for all active members eligible for an extraordinary gains transfer under section 59-1309, Idaho Code. After the initial transfer of extraordinary gains, any active member may make additional voluntary contributions to his/her account, subject to applicable limitations, by authorizing his/her employer to contribute an amount by payroll deduction to the supplemental benefit plan in lieu of receiving such amount as salary. The amount of such contributions shall be subject to any limitations established by the board, state or federal law. The employer shall provide coordination of contributions between multiple plans to assure that contribution limits are not exceeded. Should aggregate contributions to multiple plans exceed applicable limits, excess contributions shall be deemed to apply exclusively to plans not created by this chapter. In the event a preexisting plan is used as a supplemental plan, voluntary contributions may continue to be made to that plan despite the absence of extraordinary gains transfers.

For purposes of this section the employer is authorized to make such deductions from salary for any employee who has authorized such deductions in writing. The employer shall forward all contributions under this section to the board by the fifth working day after each payroll, in addition to reports as directed by the board. Any costs incurred by the board, whether direct or indirect, due to an employer’s failure to properly withhold, transfer, limit and report contributions, shall be the responsibility of the employer and shall be immediately due and payable upon notice from the board. This includes, but is not limited to, costs associated with plan corrections. Such costs shall be treated as delinquent contributions under section 59-1325, Idaho Code.

The board may enter into agreements with employers or require participation to implement the supplemental benefit plans and the board may designate administrative agents to execute all necessary agreements pertaining to the supplemental benefit plans.

All contributions received from participants in the supplemental benefit plans shall be deposited with a trustee designated by the board. All such funds are hereby perpetually appropriated to the board, shall not be included in the department’s budget, and may be invested or used to pay for investment and administrative expenses of the supplemental benefit plans. Inactive members may be required to transfer supplemental benefit plan account balances as determined by the board.

The board may establish rules to implement and administer supplemental benefit plans. Costs of administration shall be appropriated by the legislature and may be paid from the interest earnings of the funds accrued as a result of the deposits or as an assessment against each account, to be decided by the board. Investment related expenses are exempt from appropriation.

Contributions and investment earnings under the supplemental benefit plans shall be exempt from federal and state income taxes until the ultimate distribution of such contributions. Distributions of funds held in supplemental benefit plan accounts are subject to federal law limitations. The board may provide for retirement disbursement options other than lump sum payments.

All additional contributions made by the employee under this section shall continue to be included as regular compensation for the purpose of computing the employer and employee retirement contributions and pension benefits earned by an employee under this chapter, but such sum shall not be included in the computation of any income taxes withheld on behalf of any employee. However, funds accrued in a supplemental benefit plan account shall not be considered in determining any other benefits under this chapter.

The provisions of sections 59-1316 and 59-1317(1), (2) and (5), Idaho Code, shall also apply to the supplemental benefit plans created under this section. Should a court order that an assignment be made to a participant’s spouse or former spouse of all or part of an account created under this section, the assignment shall be separate and distinct from any approved domestic retirement order required by section 59-1317(4), Idaho Code. Requirements for assignments of supplemental accounts may be set forth in rule or other plan documents.

Members of the retirement board or retirement system staff shall, jointly or individually, be provided a defense and indemnified against all claims, demands, judgments, costs, charges and expenses, including court costs and attorney’s fees, and against all liability losses and damages of any nature whatsoever arising out of and in the course and scope of their official duties and functions in administering any plans created pursuant to the provisions of this section to the same extent as provided in section 59-1305(1), Idaho Code. The venue of all actions in which the retirement board or retirement staff is a party shall be in Ada county, Idaho.

§ 59-1309. Allocation of extraordinary gains.

At the close of each fiscal year, the board shall determine whether the fund has experienced extraordinary gains. If extraordinary gains exist the board may allocate all or part of them as set forth in this section. In determining whether extraordinary gains should be allocated, the board shall exercise its fiduciary discretion.

Extraordinary gains are defined as the excess, if any, at the close of the fiscal year of plan assets over the plan’s accrued actuarially determined liabilities plus a sum necessary to absorb a one (1) standard deviation market event without increasing contribution rates, as determined by the board.

If the board determines that extraordinary gains should be allocated, the gains shall be allocated to retirees, to active members, and to employers in such proportion as determined by the board. The board shall determine no later than the first day of December following the close of the fiscal year the amount of extraordinary gains to be allocated, if any.

Retirees shall receive their allocation in the form of a one-time payment made in addition to their regular monthly benefit payments. For purposes of this section, “retirees” include retired members, members receiving a disability retirement allowance, contingent annuitants, and surviving spouses who elected the annuity option under section 59-1361(5), Idaho Code. To participate in the retiree allocation, a retiree must be receiving a regular monthly allowance at the close of the fiscal year and on the date of distribution. The retiree allocation shall be distributed proportionally based on the final monthly retirement allowance of the fiscal year divided by the total of all monthly retirement allowances paid for the same month. The date of distribution shall be no later than the first day of February following the close of the fiscal year.

Active members shall receive their allocation as a transfer of funds to a supplemental retirement account established by the board. Funds transferred to or held in supplemental retirement accounts shall be accounted for separately and shall not be considered in determining any other benefits under this chapter. To participate in the active member allocation, the member must have been an active member on the last day of the fiscal year and have accrued at least twelve (12) months of service on that date. Any member who has withdrawn contributions from the fund prior to the date of transfer is not eligible to receive a transfer under this section. The active member allocation shall be distributed proportionally based on accumulated contributions at the close of the fiscal year divided by the total accumulated contributions of all active members at the close of the fiscal year, not to exceed the amount that would result by applying the limits imposed by rule or by section 415(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code to compensation earned during the fiscal year. The transfer of funds shall occur in the following calendar year but shall be subject to reduction and forfeiture, based on the application of limits imposed by rule or by section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code for that year.

§ 59-1309A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1310. Admissibility in evidence of photoreproduced copies of records or documents maintained by the system — Destroying the original.

Copies of records or documents maintained on microfilm, microfiche, computer imagery or other photoreproductive material of archival quality by the retirement system shall be as admissible in evidence as the original itself in any legal, judicial or administrative proceeding, or action, provided the custodian of records of the retirement system certifies on such copies offered into evidence that the retirement system is not in possession of the original and that the copy is a true and correct representation of the original. The original may be destroyed by the retirement system once the original is microfilmed, microfiched, digitally imaged or copied by other photoreproduction of archival quality.

§ 59-1310A. Retirement incentive plan. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1310B. Conversion of service retirement or early retirement or vested retirement allowances into optional retirement allowances

Form of optional retirement. [Repealed.]